sl-SI: Konfiguracija za prevoz zapornikov: Klop s točkami za priklenitev; Samo kletka/pregrada (brez namenskega prostora); Dvojni prostor za zapornike; Brez; Modul z zadnjo celico; Enojni prostor za zapornike; Drugo
cs: Konfigurace pro přepravu vězňů: Lavice s upínacími body; Pouze klec/přepážka (bez vyhrazeného prostoru); Dvojitý prostor pro vězně; Žádná; Zadní modul cely; Jeden prostor pro vězně; Ostatní
lt-LT: Kalinių transportavimo konfigūracija: Suolas su sulaikymo taškais; Tik narvas / pertvara (be atskiros patalpos); Dviguba kalinių sulaikymo patalpa; Nėra; Galinis kameros modulis; Vienguba kalinių sulaikymo patalpa; Kita
th: การกำหนดค่าการขนส่งนักโทษ: ม้านั่งพร้อมจุดยึดเหนี่ยว; เฉพาะกรง/ฉากกั้น (ไม่มีห้องแยกเฉพาะ); ห้องผู้ต้องขังคู่; ไม่มี; ห้องขังด้านหลัง; ห้องผู้ต้องขังเดี่ยว; อื่นๆ
fi: Vankien kuljetuskokoonpano: Penkki kiinnityspisteillä; Vain häkki/väliseinä (ei erillistä osastoa); Kaksi vankiosastoa; Ei mitään; Takaosan sellimoduuli; Yhden vangin osasto; Muu
sv: Konfiguration av fångartransport: Bänk med fästpunkter; Endast bur/skiljevägg (inget dedikerat utrymme); Dubbla fångutrymmen; Ingen; Bakre cellmodul; Enkelt fångutrymme; Övrigt
el: Διαμόρφωση μεταφοράς κρατουμένων: Πάγκος με σημεία συγκράτησης; Κλωβός/διαχωριστικό μόνο (χωρίς ειδικό χώρο); Διπλός χώρος κρατουμένων; Κανένα; Μονάδα κελιού στο πίσω μέρος; Μονός χώρος κρατουμένων; Άλλο
de: Konfiguration für den Gefangenentransport: Sitzbank mit Rückhaltepunkten; Nur Käfig/Trennwand (kein separater Bereich); Zwei Gefangenenbereiche; Keine; Hinteres Zellenmodul; Einzelner Gefangenenbereich; Sonstige
sk-SK: Konfigurácia prepravy väzňov: Lavica s bodmi na spútanie; Iba klietka/prepážka (bez vyhradeného priestoru); Dva priestory pre väzňov; Žiadne; Modul zadnej cely; Jeden priestor pre väzňa; Iné
bg-BG: Конфигурация за транспортиране на затворници: Пейка с точки за задържане; Само клетка/преграда (без специално отделение); Отделения за двама затворници; Няма; Модул за задна клетка; Отделение за един затворник; Друго
da: Konfiguration af fangetransport: Bænk med fastspændingspunkter; Kun bur/adskillelse (intet dedikeret rum); Dobbelt fangerum; Ingen; Bagcellemodul; Enkelt fangerum; Anden
pt-PT: Configuração para o transporte de detidos: Banco com pontos de retenção; Apenas gaiola/divisória (sem compartimento dedicado); Dois compartimentos para prisioneiros; Nenhuma; Módulo de cela traseiro; Compartimento único para prisioneiro; Outra
zh-CN: 囚犯运输配置: 带约束点的长凳; 仅铁笼/隔板（无专用隔间）; 双囚犯隔间; 无; 后部囚室模块; 单囚犯隔间; 其他
fr: Configuration pour le transport de détenus: Banc avec points de retenue; Cage/cloison uniquement (sans compartiment dédié); Doubles compartiments pour prisonniers; Aucune; Module de cellule arrière; Compartiment simple pour prisonnier; Autre
tr: Mahkum nakli konfigürasyonu: Bağlama noktalı bank; Sadece kafes/bölme (özel bölme yok); Çift mahkum bölmesi; Yok; Arka hücre modülü; Tek mahkum bölmesi; Diğer
es: Configuración del transporte de prisioneros: Banco con puntos de sujeción; Solo jaula/división (sin compartimento exclusivo); Compartimentos dobles para prisioneros; Ninguno; Módulo de celda trasera; Compartimento individual para prisionero; Otro
ko: 수감자 수송 구성: 구속 지점이 있는 벤치; 케이지/격벽만(전용 공간 없음); 이중 수감자 호송 공간; 없음; 후면 수감실 모듈; 단일 수감자 호송 공간; 기타
hr-HR: Konfiguracija prijevoza zatvorenika: Klupa s točkama za vezivanje; Samo kavez/pregrada (bez namjenskog odjeljka); Dvostruki odjeljci za zatvorenike; Ništa; Stražnji modul ćelije; Jednostruki odjeljak za zatvorenike; Ostalo
ja: 囚人輸送構成: 拘束ポイント付きベンチ; ケージ/パーティションのみ (専用コンパートメントなし); デュアル囚人コンパートメント; なし; リアセルモジュール; シングル囚人コンパートメント; その他
it: Configurazione del trasporto dei detenuti: Panca con punti di contenzione; Solo gabbia/divisorio (nessuno scompartimento dedicato); Doppio scompartimento per prigionieri; Nessuno; Modulo cella posteriore; Scompartimento singolo per prigionieri; Altro
nl: Gedetineerdenvervoer configuratie: Bank met bevestigingspunten; Alleen kooi/tussenschot (geen speciaal compartiment); Dubbele gevangenencompartimenten; Geen; Achterste celmodule; Enkel gevangenencompartiment; Anders
zh-TW: 囚犯運輸配置: 附束縛點的長椅; 僅鐵籠/隔板 (無專用隔間); 雙人囚犯隔間; 無; 後置牢房模組; 單人囚犯隔間; 其他
hu: Fogolyszállítási konfiguráció: Pad rögzítési pontokkal; Csak rács / válaszfal (nincs külön rekesz); Kettős fogolytér; Nincs; Hátsó cellamodul; Egyszemélyes fogolytér; Egyéb
pl: Konfiguracja transportu więźniów: Ławka z punktami mocowania zabezpieczeń; Tylko klatka/przegroda (brak wydzielonego przedziału); Podwójne przedziały dla więźniów; Brak; Tylny moduł celi; Pojedynczy przedział dla więźnia; Inna
nb: Konfigurasjon av fangetransport: Benk med festepunkter; Kun bur/skillevegg (ingen dedikert avdeling); To fangeavdelinger; Ingen; Cellemodul bak; Enkel fangeavdeling; Annet
ro-RO: Configurația transportului de prizonieri: Bancă cu puncte de imobilizare; Doar cușcă/perete despărțitor (fără compartiment dedicat); Compartimente duble pentru deținuți; Fără; Modul cu celulă în spate; Compartiment individual pentru deținuți; Altele
en: Prisoner transport configuration: Bench with restraint points; Cage/partition only (no dedicated compartment); Dual prisoner compartments; None; Rear cell module; Single prisoner compartment; Other
vi: Cấu hình vận chuyển tù nhân: Ghế băng có điểm nẹp giữ; Chỉ có lồng/vách ngăn (không có khoang chuyên dụng); Khoang tù nhân kép; Không có; Mô-đun buồng giam phía sau; Khoang tù nhân đơn; Khác
pt-BR: Transporte de presos configuração: Banco com pontos de retenção; Apenas gaiola/divisória (sem compartimento dedicado); Compartimentos duplos para prisioneiros; Nenhuma; Módulo de cela traseira; Compartimento único para prisioneiro; Outra
ru: Конфигурация перевозки задержанных: Скамья с точками крепления наручников; Только решетка / перегородка (без отдельного отсека); Два отсека для задержанных; Нет; Задний модульный отсек; Один отсек для задержанного; Другое